Louisiana, session 2026, HB796.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2801(4) and (5) and 2807 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2801. Definitions
* * *
(4) "Preceptee" means a chiropractic student defined by the board.
(5) "Preceptor" means a licensed chiropractor as defined by the board.
* * *
§2807. Preceptors; preceptees; duties and responsibilities
A. A preceptor may delegate responsibility to a preceptee under this Section
if:
(1) The preceptor has held an active chiropractic license in good standing in
this state or another jurisdiction for five years.
(2) The preceptor has not had any disciplinary issues in the preceding three
years, does not have any open complaints, or is not under investigation for any
matters.
(3) The preceptor has been licensed by the board.
B. A preceptor may delegate to a preceptee currently enrolled in an
accredited chiropractic college the performance of adjustments or manipulations if
the preceptee has qualified for admission to the college outpatient clinic. Both the
preceptor and preceptee shall register with the board and notify patients who is the
preceptor and preceptee.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 796 ENROLLED
C. A preceptor shall be physically onsite but need not be present when a
preceptee performs an adjustment or manipulation.
D. A chiropractic preceptee performing adjustments or manipulation in
accordance with this Section may not present to the public that the preceptee is a
licensed chiropractor.
E. A preceptor may not delegate responsibility to render a diagnosis or
prescribe a treatment plan to a preceptee pursuant to this Section.
F. A preceptor or preceptee who violates this Section is subject to
disciplinary action.
G. A preceptor and preceptee shall adhere to recommendations of
chiropractic student procedure as defined by the board.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.